North Carolina statutes. Chapter 122C. Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Act of 1985.
Article 3. Clients’ Rights and Advance Instruction.
§ 122C-55.
Exceptions; care and treatment. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Any facility may share confidential information regarding any client of that facility with any other facility when necessary to coordinate appropriate and effective care, treatment, or habilitation of the client. For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

“Client” includes an enrollee as defined in

G.S. 108D-1

.

(1a)

Coordinate. — The provision, coordination, or management of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services and other health or related services by one or more facilities and includes the referral of a client from one facility to another.

Facility or area facility. — Include[s] an area authority or a prepaid health plan.

Secretary. — Includes any primary care case management programs that contract with the Department to provide a primary care case management program for recipients of publicly funded health and related services.

(a1)

Any facility may share confidential information regarding any client of that facility with the Secretary, and the Secretary may share confidential information regarding any client with a facility when necessary to conduct quality assessment and improvement activities or to coordinate appropriate and effective care, treatment, or habilitation of the client. For purposes of this subsection, subsection (a6), and subsection (a7) of this section, the purposes or activities for which confidential information may be disclosed include, but are not limited to, case management and care coordination, disease management, outcomes evaluation, the development of clinical guidelines and protocols, the development of care management plans and systems, population-based activities relating to improving or reducing health care costs, and the provision, coordination, or management of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services and other health or related services.

(a2)

Any facility or the psychiatric service of the University of North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill may share confidential information regarding any client of that facility with any other area facility or State facility or the psychiatric service of the University of North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill when necessary to conduct payment activities relating to an individual served by the facility. Payment activities are activities undertaken by a facility to obtain payment or receive reimbursement for the provision of services and may include, but are not limited to, determinations of eligibility or coverage, coordination of benefits, determinations of cost-sharing amounts, claims management, claims processing, claims adjudication, claims appeals, billing and collection activities, medical necessity reviews, utilization management and review, precertification and preauthorization of services, concurrent and retrospective review of services, and appeals related to utilization management and review.

(a3)

Whenever there is reason to believe that a client is eligible for benefits through a Department program, any facility or the psychiatric service of the University of North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill may share confidential information regarding any client of that facility with the Secretary, and the Secretary may share confidential information regarding any client with an area facility or State facility or the psychiatric services of the University of North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill. Disclosure is limited to that information necessary to establish initial eligibility for benefits, determine continued eligibility over time, and obtain reimbursement for the costs of services provided to the client.

(a4)

An area authority or prepaid health plan may share confidential information regarding any client with any area facility, and any area facility may share confidential information regarding any client of that facility with the area authority or prepaid health plan, when the area authority or prepaid health plan determines the disclosure is necessary to develop, manage, monitor, or evaluate the area authority’s or prepaid health plan’s network of qualified providers as provided in G.S. 122C-115.2(b)(1)b., G.S. 122C-141(a), Article 3 of Chapter 108D of the General Statutes, the State Plan, rules of the Secretary, and contracts between the facility and the Department. For the purposes of this subsection, the purposes or activities for which confidential information may be disclosed include, but are not limited to, quality assessment and improvement activities, provider accreditation and staff credentialing, developing contracts and negotiating rates, investigating and responding to client grievances and complaints, evaluating practitioner and provider performance, auditing functions, on-site monitoring, conducting consumer satisfaction studies, and collecting and analyzing performance data.

(a5)

Any area facility may share confidential information with any other area facility regarding an applicant when necessary to determine whether the applicant is eligible for area facility services. For the purpose of this subsection, the term “applicant” means an individual who contacts an area facility for services.

(a6)

When necessary to conduct quality assessment and improvement activities or to coordinate appropriate and effective care, treatment, or habilitation of the client, the Department’s Community Care of North Carolina Program, or other primary care case management program, may disclose confidential information acquired pursuant to subsection (a1) of this section to a health care provider or other entity that has entered into a written agreement with the Community Care of North Carolina Program, or other primary care case management program, to participate in the care management support network and systems developed and maintained by the primary care case manager for the purpose of coordinating and improving the quality of care for recipients of publicly funded health and related services. Health care providers and other entities receiving confidential information that has been disclosed pursuant to this subsection may use and disclose the information as permitted or required under 45 Code of Federal Regulations Part 164, Subpart E.

(a7)

A facility may share confidential information with one or more HIPAA covered entities or business associates for the same purposes set forth in subsection (a1) of this section. Before making disclosures under this subsection, the facility shall inform the client or the client’s legally responsible person that the facility may make the disclosures unless the client or the client’s legally responsible person objects in writing or signs a non-disclosure form that shall be supplied by the facility. If the client or the client’s legally responsible person objects in writing or signs a non-disclosure form, the disclosures otherwise permitted by this subsection are prohibited. A covered entity or business associate receiving confidential information that has been disclosed by a facility pursuant to this subsection may use and disclose the information as permitted or required under 45 Code of Federal Regulations Part 164, Subpart E. This confidential information, however, shall not be used or disclosed for discriminatory purposes including, without limitation, employment discrimination, medical insurance coverage or rate discrimination, or discrimination by law enforcement officers.

A facility, physician, or other individual responsible for evaluation, management, supervision, or treatment of respondents examined or committed for outpatient treatment under the provisions of Article 5 of this Chapter may request, receive, and disclose confidential information to the extent necessary to fulfill the facility’s, physician’s, or individual’s responsibilities.

A facility may furnish confidential information in its possession to the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction when requested by that department regarding any client of that facility when the inmate has been determined by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction to be in need of treatment for mental illness, developmental disabilities, or substance abuse. The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction may furnish to a facility confidential information in its possession about treatment for mental illness, developmental disabilities, or substance abuse that the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction has provided to any present or former inmate if the inmate is presently seeking treatment from the requesting facility or if the inmate has been involuntarily committed to the requesting facility for inpatient or outpatient treatment. Under the circumstances described in this subsection, the consent of the client or inmate is not required in order for this information to be furnished, and the information shall be furnished despite objection by the client or inmate. Confidential information disclosed pursuant to this subsection is restricted from further disclosure.

(c1)

(See editor’s note for effective date information)

A facility may furnish confidential information in its possession to the sheriff of any county when requested by the sheriff regarding any client of that facility who is confined in the county’s jail or jail annex when the inmate has been determined by the county jail medical unit to be in need of treatment for mental illness, developmental disabilities, or substance abuse. The sheriff may furnish to a facility confidential information in its possession about treatment for mental illness, developmental disabilities, or substance abuse that the county jail medical unit has provided to any present or former inmate if the inmate is presently seeking treatment from the requesting facility or if the inmate has been involuntarily committed to the requesting facility for inpatient or outpatient treatment. Under the circumstances described in this subsection, the consent of the client or inmate is not required in order for this information to be furnished, and the information shall be furnished despite objection by the client or inmate. Confidential information disclosed pursuant to this subsection is restricted from further disclosure.

A responsible professional may disclose confidential information when in the responsible professional’s opinion there is an imminent danger to the health or safety of the client or another individual or there is a likelihood of the commission of a felony or violent misdemeanor.

A responsible professional may exchange confidential information with a physician or other health care provider that is providing emergency medical services to a client. Disclosure of the information is limited to that necessary to meet the emergency as determined by the responsible professional.

(e1)

A State facility may furnish client identifying information to the Department for the purpose of maintaining an index of clients served in State facilities that may be used by State facilities only if that information is necessary for the appropriate and effective evaluation, care, and treatment of the client.

(e2)

A responsible professional may disclose an advance instruction for mental health treatment or confidential information from an advance instruction to a physician, psychologist, or other qualified professional when the responsible professional determines that disclosure is necessary to give effect to or provide treatment in accordance with the advance instruction.

A facility may disclose confidential information to a provider of support services whenever the facility has entered into a written agreement with a person to provide support services and the agreement includes a provision in which the provider of support services acknowledges that in receiving, storing, processing, or otherwise dealing with any confidential information, the provider of support services will safeguard and not further disclose the information.

Whenever there is reason to believe that the client is eligible for financial benefits through a governmental agency, a facility may disclose confidential information to State, local, or federal government agencies. Except as provided in subsections (a3) and (g1) of this section, disclosure is limited to that confidential information necessary to establish financial benefits for a client. Except as provided in subsection (g1) of this section, after establishment of these benefits, the consent of the client or the client’s legally responsible person is required for further release of confidential information under this subsection.

(g1)

A State facility operated under the authority of

G.S. 122C-181

may disclose confidential information for the purpose of collecting payment due the facility for the cost of care, treatment, or habilitation.

(g2)

Whenever there is reason to believe that the client is eligible for educational services through a governmental agency, a facility shall disclose client identifying information to the Department of Public Instruction. Disclosure is limited to that information necessary to establish, coordinate, or maintain educational services. The Department of Public Instruction may further disclose client identifying information to a local school administrative unit as necessary.

Within a facility, employees, students, consultants, or volunteers involved in the care, treatment, or habilitation of a client may exchange confidential information as needed for the purpose of carrying out their responsibility in serving the client.

Upon specific request, a responsible professional may release confidential information to a physician or psychologist who referred the client to the facility.

Upon request of the next of kin or other family member who has a legitimate role in the therapeutic services offered, or other person designated by the client or the client’s legally responsible person, the responsible professional shall provide the next of kin or other family member or the designee with notification of the client’s diagnosis, the prognosis, the medications prescribed, the dosage of the medications prescribed, the side effects of the medications prescribed, if any, and the progress of the client, if the client or the client’s legally responsible person has consented in writing, or the client has consented orally in the presence of a witness selected by the client, prior to the release of this information. Both the client’s or the legally responsible person’s consent and the release of this information shall be documented in the client’s medical record. This consent shall be valid for a specified length of time only and is subject to revocation by the consenting individual.

Notwithstanding G.S. 122C-53(b) or

G.S. 122C-206

, upon request of the next of kin or other family member who has a legitimate role in the therapeutic services offered, or other person designated by the client or the client’s legally responsible person, the responsible professional shall provide the next of kin, the family member, or the designee, notification of the client’s admission to the facility, transfer to another facility, decision to leave the facility against medical advice, discharge from the facility, and referrals and appointment information for treatment after discharge, after notification to the client that this information has been requested.

In response to a written request of the next of kin or other family member who has a legitimate role in the therapeutic services offered, or other person designated by the client, for additional information not provided for in subsections (j) and (k) of this section, and when the written request identifies the intended use for this information, the responsible professional shall, in a timely manner, do one or more of the following:

Provide the information requested based upon the responsible professional’s determination that providing this information will be to the client’s therapeutic benefit, if the client or the client’s legally responsible person has consented in writing to the release of the information requested.

Refuse to provide the information requested based upon the responsible professional’s determination that providing this information will be detrimental to the therapeutic relationship between client and professional.

Refuse to provide the information requested based upon the responsible professional’s determination that the next of kin or family member or designee does not have a legitimate need for the information requested.

The Commission for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services shall adopt rules specifically to define the legitimate role referred to in subsections (j), (k), and (l) of this section.

History.

1955, c. 887, s. 12; 1963, c. 1166, s. 10; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; c. 476, s. 133; c. 673, s. 5; c. 1408, s. 2; 1979, c. 147; 1983, c. 383, s. 10; c. 491; c. 638, s. 22; c. 864, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; c. 695, s. 15; 1987, c. 638, ss. 2, 3; 1989, c. 141, s. 10; c. 438; c. 625, s. 8; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 27; 1991, c. 359, s. 1; c. 544, s. 1; 1998-198, s. 4; 2003-313, s. 3; 2009-65, s. 1(a), (b); 2009-487, s. 5; 2009-570, s. 43; 2011-102, ss. 3, 4; 2011-145, ss. 10.14, 19.1(h); 2011-314, s. 2(b); 2011-391, s. 23; 2014-100, s. 8.39(d); 2017-186, s. 2(kkkkk); 2018-33, s. 5; 2019-81, s. 9A; 2019-177, s. 6.1(a), (b); 2019-240, s. 26(c); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

§ 122C-56.
Exceptions; research and planning.

The Secretary may require information that does not identify clients from State and area facilities for purposes of preparing statistical reports of activities and services and for planning and study. The Secretary may also receive confidential information from State and area facilities when specifically required by other State or federal law.

The Secretary may have access to confidential information from private or public agencies or agents for purposes of research and evaluation in the areas of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse. No confidential information shall be further disclosed.

A facility may disclose confidential information to persons responsible for conducting general research or clinical, financial, or administrative audits if there is a justifiable documented need for this information. A person receiving the information may not directly or indirectly identify any client in any report of the research or audit or otherwise disclose client identity in any way.

History.

1965, c. 800, s. 4; 1973, c. 476, s. 133; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1989, c. 625, s. 9.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “Psychiatrists’ Liability to Third Parties for Harmful Acts Committed by Dangerous Patients,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1534 (1986).

§ 122C-56.1.
Exceptions; security recordings.

Security recordings are not a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes and are confidential information under this Chapter.

A State facility is not required to disclose its security recordings unless required under federal law or compelled by a court of competent jurisdiction.

A State facility shall allow viewing of security recordings by an internal client advocate.

A State facility may allow viewing of a security recording by a client or their legally responsible person if, in the opinion of the responsible professional, it is determined to be in the best interest of the client.

History.

2019-240, s. 20(b).

§ 122C-57.
Right to treatment and consent to treatment.

Each client who is admitted to and is receiving services from a facility has the right to receive age-appropriate treatment for a mental illness, an intellectual or other developmental disability, substance abuse, or a combination thereof. Each client within 30 days of admission to a facility shall have an individual written treatment or habilitation plan implemented by the facility. The client and the client’s legally responsible person shall be informed in advance of the potential risks and alleged benefits of the treatment choices.

Each client has the right to be free from unnecessary or excessive medication. Medication shall not be used for punishment, discipline, or staff convenience.

Medication shall be administered in accordance with accepted medical standards and only upon the order of a physician as documented in the client’s record.

Each voluntarily admitted client or the client’s legally responsible person (including a health care agent named pursuant to a valid health care power of attorney) has the right to consent to or refuse any treatment offered by the facility. Consent may be withdrawn at any time by the person who gave the consent. If treatment is refused, the qualified professional shall determine whether treatment in some other modality is possible. If all appropriate treatment modalities are refused, the voluntarily admitted client may be discharged. In an emergency, a voluntarily admitted client may be administered treatment or medication, other than those specified in subsection (f) of this section, despite the refusal of the client or the client’s legally responsible person, even if the client’s refusal is expressed in a valid advance instruction for mental health treatment. The Commission may adopt rules to provide a procedure to be followed when a voluntarily admitted client refuses treatment.

(d1)

Except as provided in

G.S. 90-21.4

, discharge of a voluntarily admitted minor from treatment shall include notice to and consultation with the minor’s legally responsible person and in no event shall a minor be discharged from treatment upon the minor’s request alone.

In the case of an involuntarily committed client, treatment measures other than those requiring express written consent as specified in subsection (f) of this section may be given despite the refusal of the client, the client’s legally responsible person, a health care agent named pursuant to a valid health care power of attorney, or the client’s refusal expressed in a valid advance instruction for mental health treatment in the event of an emergency or when consideration of side effects related to the specific treatment measure is given and in the professional judgment, as documented in the client’s record, of the treating physician and a second physician, who is either the director of clinical services of the facility, or the director’s designee, that any of the following is true:

The client, without the benefit of the specific treatment measure, is incapable of participating in any available treatment plan which will give the client a realistic opportunity of improving the client’s condition.

There is, without the benefit of the specific treatment measure, a significant possibility that the client will harm self or others before improvement of the client’s condition is realized.

Treatment involving electroshock therapy, the use of experimental drugs or procedures, or surgery other than emergency surgery may not be given without the express and informed written consent of the client, the client’s legally responsible person, a health care agent named pursuant to a valid health care power of attorney, or the client’s consent expressed in a valid advance instruction for mental health treatment. This consent may be withdrawn at any time by the person who gave the consent. The Commission may adopt rules specifying other therapeutic and diagnostic procedures that require the express and informed written consent of the client, the client’s legally responsible person, or a health care agent named pursuant to a valid health care power of attorney.

History.

1973, c. 475, s. 1; c. 1436, ss. 6, 7; 1981, c. 328, ss. 1, 2; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1995, c. 336, s. 1; 1997-442, s. 3; 1998-198, s. 5; 1998-217, s. 53(a)(4); 1999-456, s. 4; 2007-502, s. 15(b); 2019-76, s. 2.

§ 122C-58.
Civil rights and civil remedies.

Except as otherwise provided in this Chapter, each adult client of a facility keeps the same right as any other citizen of North Carolina to exercise all civil rights, including the right to dispose of property, execute instruments, make purchases, enter into contractual relationships, register and vote, bring civil actions, and marry and get a divorce, unless the exercise of a civil right has been precluded by an unrevoked adjudication of incompetency. This section shall not be construed as validating the act of any client who was in fact incompetent at the time he performed the act.

History.

1973, c. 475, s. 1; c. 1436, ss. 2-5; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-59.
Use of corporal punishment.

Corporal punishment may not be inflicted upon any client.

History.

1973, c. 475, s. 1; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-60.
Use of physical restraints or seclusion.

Physical restraint or seclusion of a client shall be employed only when there is imminent danger of abuse or injury to the client or others, when substantial property damage is occurring, or when the restraint or seclusion is necessary as a measure of therapeutic treatment. For purposes of this section, a technique to reenact the birthing process as defined by

G.S. 14-401.21

is not a measure of therapeutic treatment. All instances of restraint or seclusion and the detailed reasons for such action shall be documented in the client’s record. Each client who is restrained or secluded shall be observed frequently, and a written notation of the observation shall be made in the client’s record.

(a1)

A facility that employs physical restraint or seclusion of a client shall collect data on the use of the restraints and seclusion. The data shall reflect for each incidence, the type of procedure used, the length of time employed, alternatives considered or employed, and the effectiveness of the procedure or alternative employed. The facility shall analyze the data on at least a quarterly basis to monitor effectiveness, determine trends, and take corrective action where necessary. The facility shall make the data available to the Secretary upon request. Nothing in this subsection abrogates State or federal law or requirements pertaining to the confidentiality, privilege, or other prohibition against disclosure of information provided to the Secretary under this subsection. In reviewing data requested under this subsection, the Secretary shall adhere to State and federal requirements of confidentiality, privilege, and other prohibitions against disclosure and release applicable to the information received under this subsection.

(a2)

Facilities shall implement policies and practices that emphasize the use of alternatives to physical restraint and seclusion. Physical restraint and seclusion may be employed only by staff who have been trained and have demonstrated competence in the proper use of and alternatives to these procedures. Facilities shall ensure that staff authorized to employ and terminate these procedures are retrained and have demonstrated competence at least annually.

The Commission shall adopt rules to implement this section. In adopting rules, the Commission shall take into consideration federal regulations and national accreditation standards. Rules adopted by the Commission shall include:

Staff training and competence in:

The use of positive behavioral supports.

Communication strategies for defusing and deescalating potentially dangerous behavior.

Monitoring vital indicators.

Administration of CPR.

Debriefing with client and staff.

Methods for determining staff competence, including qualifications of trainers and training curricula.

Other areas to ensure the safe and appropriate use of restraints and seclusion.

Other matters relating to the use of physical restraint or seclusion of clients necessary to ensure the safety of clients and others.The Department may investigate complaints and inspect a facility at any time to ensure compliance with this section.

History.

1973, c. 475, s. 1; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 2000-129, s. 1; 2003-205, s. 2.

§ 122C-61.
Treatment rights in 24-hour facilities.

In addition to the rights set forth in

G.S. 122C-57

, each client who is receiving services at a 24-hour facility has the following rights:

The right to receive necessary treatment for and prevention of physical ailments based upon the client’s condition and projected length of stay. The facility may seek to collect appropriate reimbursement for its costs in providing the treatment and prevention; and

The right to have, as soon as practical during treatment or habilitation but not later than the time of discharge, an individualized written discharge plan containing recommendations for further services designed to enable the client to live as normally as possible. A discharge plan may not be required when it is not feasible because of an unanticipated discontinuation of a client’s treatment. With the consent of the client or his legally responsible person, the professionals responsible for the plans shall contact appropriate agencies at the client’s destination or in his home community before formulating the recommendations. A copy of the plan shall be furnished to the client or to his legally responsible person and, with the consent of the client, to the client’s next of kin.

History.

1973, c. 475, s. 1; c. 1436, ss. 6, 7; 1981, c. 328, ss. 1, 2; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-62.
Additional rights in 24-hour facilities. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

In addition to the rights enumerated in

G.S. 122C-51

through

G.S. 122C-61

, each adult client who is receiving treatment or habilitation in a 24-hour facility keeps the right to:

Send and receive sealed mail and have access to writing material, postage, and staff assistance when necessary;

Contact and consult with, at his own expense and at no cost to the facility, legal counsel, private physicians, and private mental health, developmental disabilities, or substance abuse professionals of his choice; and

Contact and consult with a client advocate if there is a client advocate.

The rights specified in this subsection may not be restricted by the facility and each adult client may exercise these rights at all reasonable times.

Except as provided in subsections (e) and (h) of this section, each adult client who is receiving treatment or habilitation in a 24-hour facility at all times keeps the right to:

Make and receive confidential telephone calls. All long distance calls shall be paid for by the client at the time of making the call or made collect to the receiving party;

Receive visitors between the hours of 8:00 a.m. and 9:00 p.m. for a period of at least six hours daily, two hours of which shall be after 6:00 p.m.; however visiting shall not take precedence over therapies;

Communicate and meet under appropriate supervision with individuals of his own choice upon the consent of the individuals;

Make visits outside the custody of the facility unless:

Commitment proceedings were initiated as the result of the client’s being charged with a violent crime, including a crime involving an assault with a deadly weapon, and the respondent was found not guilty by reason of insanity or incapable of proceeding;

The client was voluntarily admitted or committed to the facility while under order of commitment to a correctional facility of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety; or

The client is being held to determine capacity to proceed pursuant to

G.S. 15A-1002

;

A court order may expressly authorize visits otherwise prohibited by the existence of the conditions prescribed by this subdivision;

Be out of doors daily and have access to facilities and equipment for physical exercise several times a week;

Except as prohibited by law, keep and use personal clothing and possessions, unless the client is being held to determine capacity to proceed pursuant to

G.S. 15A-1002

;

Participate in religious worship;

Keep and spend a reasonable sum of his own money;

Retain a driver’s license, unless otherwise prohibited by Chapter 20 of the General Statutes; and

Have access to individual storage space for his private use.

In addition to the rights enumerated in

G.S. 122C-51

through

G.S. 122C-57

and

G.S. 122C-59

through

G.S. 122C-61

, each minor client who is receiving treatment or habilitation in a 24-hour facility has the right to have access to proper adult supervision and guidance. In recognition of the minor’s status as a developing individual, the minor shall be provided opportunities to enable him to mature physically, emotionally, intellectually, socially, and vocationally. In view of the physical, emotional, and intellectual immaturity of the minor, the 24-hour facility shall provide appropriate structure, supervision and control consistent with the rights given to the minor pursuant to this Part. The facility shall also, where practical, make reasonable efforts to ensure that each minor client receives treatment apart and separate from adult clients unless the treatment needs of the minor client dictate otherwise.Each minor client who is receiving treatment or habilitation from a 24-hour facility has the right to:

Communicate and consult with his parents or guardian or the agency or individual having legal custody of him;

Contact and consult with, at his own expense or that of his legally responsible person and at no cost to the facility, legal counsel, private physicians, private mental health, developmental disabilities, or substance abuse professionals, of his or his legally responsible person’s choice; and

Contact and consult with a client advocate, if there is a client advocate.

The rights specified in this subsection may not be restricted by the facility and each minor client may exercise these rights at all reasonable times.

Except as provided in subsections (e) and (h) of this section, each minor client who is receiving treatment or habilitation in a 24-hour facility has the right to:

Make and receive telephone calls. All long distance calls shall be paid for by the client at the time of making the call or made collect to the receiving party;

Send and receive mail and have access to writing materials, postage, and staff assistance when necessary;

Under appropriate supervision, receive visitors between the hours of 8:00 a.m. and 9:00 p.m. for a period of at least six hours daily, two hours of which shall be after 6:00 p.m.; however visiting shall not take precedence over school or therapies;

Receive special education and vocational training in accordance with federal and State law;

Be out of doors daily and participate in play, recreation, and physical exercise on a regular basis in accordance with his needs;

Except as prohibited by law, keep and use personal clothing and possessions under appropriate supervision, unless the client is being held to determine capacity to proceed pursuant to

G.S. 15A-1002

;

Participate in religious worship;

Have access to individual storage space for the safekeeping of personal belongings;

Have access to and spend a reasonable sum of his own money; and

Retain a driver’s license, unless otherwise prohibited by Chapter 20 of the General Statutes.

No right enumerated in subsections (b) or (d) of this section may be limited or restricted except by the qualified professional responsible for the formulation of the client’s treatment or habilitation plan. A written statement shall be placed in the client’s record that indicates the detailed reason for the restriction. The restriction shall be reasonable and related to the client’s treatment or habilitation needs. A restriction is effective for a period not to exceed 30 days. An evaluation of each restriction shall be conducted by the qualified professional at least every seven days, at which time the restriction may be removed. Each evaluation of a restriction shall be documented in the client’s record. Restrictions on rights may be renewed only by a written statement entered by the qualified professional in the client’s record that states the reason for the renewal of the restriction. In the case of an adult client who has not been adjudicated incompetent, in each instance of an initial restriction or renewal of a restriction of rights, an individual designated by the client shall, upon the consent of the client, be notified of the restriction and of the reason for it. In the case of a minor client or an incompetent adult client, the legally responsible person shall be notified of each instance of an initial restriction or renewal of a restriction of rights and of the reason for it. Notification of the designated individual or legally responsible person shall be documented in writing in the client’s record.

The Commission may adopt rules to implement subsection (e) of this section.

With regard to clients being held to determine capacity to proceed pursuant to

G.S. 15A-1002

or clients in a facility for substance abuse, and notwithstanding the prior provisions of this section, the Commission may adopt rules restricting the rights set forth under (b)(2), (b)(3), and (d)(3) of this section if restrictions are necessary and reasonable in order to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the client involved or other clients.

The rights stated in subdivisions (b)(2), (b)(4), (b)(5), (b)(10), (d)(3), (d)(5) and (d)(8) may be modified in a general hospital by that hospital to be the same as for other patients in that hospital; provided that any restriction of a specific client’s rights shall be done in accordance with the provisions of subsection (e) of this section.

History.

1973, c. 475, s. 1; c. 1436, ss. 2-5, 8; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1989, c. 625, s. 10; 1995, c. 299, s. 2; 1997-456, s. 27; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(lllll).